Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.070

Eligible credentialed health care professions—Health professional shortage areas—Specific profession selection criteria.

(1) After June 1, 1992, the department, in consultation with the office and the department of social and health services, shall:

(a) Determine eligible credentialed health care professions for the purposes of the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program and the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program authorized by this chapter. Eligibility shall be based upon an assessment that determines that there is a shortage or insufficient availability of a credentialed profession so as to jeopardize patient care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department shall consider the relative degree of shortages among professions when determining eligibility. The department may add or remove professions from eligibility based upon the determination that a profession is no longer in shortage. Should a profession no longer be eligible, participants or eligible students who have received scholarships shall be eligible to continue to receive scholarships or loan repayments until they are no longer eligible or until their service obligation has been completed;

(b) Determine health professional shortage areas for each of the eligible credentialed health care professions; and

(c) Determine underserved behavioral health areas for each of the eligible credentialed health care professions.

(2) The office, in consultation with the department, shall determine selection criteria for nurse educators and approved nursing programs.

(3) The office, in consultation with the department and the council, shall determine selection criteria for board-certified forensic pathologists.

(4) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, consideration for eligibility for loan repayment shall also be given to chiropractors and psychiatric mental health nurse practitioners.

[ 2024 c 369 s 2. Prior: 2023 c 475 s 925; 2023 c 442 s 6; 2022 c 276 s 4; 2021 c 334 s 962; prior: 2019 c 415 s 954; 2019 c 406 s 72; 2019 c 302 s 6; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 958; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 947; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 207; 2003 c 278 s 3; 1991 c 332 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

Intent—2023 c 442: See note following RCW 28B.115.020.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—2003 c 278: See note following RCW 28C.18.120.